Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, a section shall be added to article I, to read: new text end new text begin Sec. 18. new text end new text begin All persons shall be guaranteed equal rights under the laws of this state. The state shall not discriminate against any person in intent or effect on account of one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (a) race; new text end new text begin (b) color; new text end new text begin (c) national origin; new text end new text begin (d) ancestry; new text end new text begin (e) disability; or new text end new text begin (f) sex, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (i) making and effectuating decisions about all matters relating to one's own pregnancy or decision whether to become or remain pregnant; new text end new text begin (ii) gender identity or gender expression; or new text end new text begin (iii) sexual orientation. new text end new text begin Any action by the state that denies an individual's equal rights shall be invalid unless, at a minimum, it is the least restrictive means of achieving a compelling governmental interest. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, state includes the state or any agency or political subdivision of the state. new text end new text begin This section is self-executing. This section does not limit or narrow existing rights in this constitution. Nothing in this section shall invalidate or prevent the adoption of any law, regulation, program, practice, or benefit designed to prevent or remedy discrimination on the basis of characteristics listed in this section. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin (a) The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. If ratified, the amendment is effective January 1, 2027. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to say that all persons shall be guaranteed equal rights under the laws of this state, and shall not be discriminated against on account of race, color, national origin, ancestry, disability, or sex, including pregnancy, gender, and sexual orientation? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end new text begin (b) The title required under Minnesota Statutes, section 204D.15, subdivision 1, for the question submitted to the people under paragraph (a) shall be: "Minnesota Equal Rights Amendment." new text end